Wisconsin, session 2025, AB77.
do enact as follows:AB77,11Section 1. 347.495 of the statutes is created to read:AB77,2,52347.495 Registration plate concealment device. (1) In this section, 3“registration plate concealment device” means a manual, electronic, or mechanical 4device designed or adapted to be installed on a motor vehicle to do any of the 5following:AB77,2,66(a) Switch between 2 or more registration plates.AB77,2,77(b) Move, obstruct, or conceal a registration plate.AB77,2,98(c) Alter the appearance of a registration plate so that the registration number 9cannot be seen and read.AB77,2,1110(2) No person may possess, sell, purchase, install, or use a registration plate 11concealment device.AB77,2,1312(3) No motor vehicle may be equipped with a registration plate concealment 13device.AB77,2,1614(4) Any motor vehicle equipped in violation of sub. (3) may be impounded. A 15vehicle impounded under this subsection shall be returned to the owner upon 16payment of reasonable costs of towing and impounding the vehicle.AB77,217Section 2. 347.50 (6) of the statutes is created to read:AB77,2,1918347.50 (6) Any person violating s. 347.495 may be fined not more than $1,000 19or imprisoned for not more than 90 days, or both.AB77,2,2020